CorporateLionsgateLIONSGATE Governance
						
							Jon
						
							FeltheimerChief Executive Officer
						
							Michael
						
							BurnsVice Chairman
						
							Steve
						
							BeeksCo-Chief Operating Officer and Co-President, Motion Picture Group
						
							Brian
						
							GoldsmithCo-Chief Operating Officer
						
							Wayne
						
							LevinGeneral Counsel and Chief Strategic Officer
						
							James
						
							W.
						
							BargeChief Financial OfficerJames W. Barge Chief Financial OfficerJoined Lionsgate as CFO in October 2013.Graduated Summa Cum Laude from the University of Georgia with a degree in Business Administration.Jimmy is a triathlete, golfer and avid surfer.James W.
“Jimmy” Barge was named Chief Financial Officer of Lionsgate, a premier next
generation global content leader, in October 2013.  He has oversight of all financial operations,
planning and strategy and is a member of the Company’s senior management team,
reporting to Chief Executive Officer Jon Feltheimer.Mr. Barge
previously served as Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of
Viacom Inc. from 2010-2012 and Executive Vice President, Controller, Tax &
Treasury, from 2008-2010.  While at Viacom, he was responsible for
overseeing all aspects of the company’s global finances and capital structure.Prior to
joining Viacom, Mr. Barge had a13-year tenure at Time Warner, ultimately
serving as Time Warner Senior Vice President, Controller and Chief Accounting
Officer.  In this capacity, he was responsible for Time Warner’s overall
financial planning, reporting and analysis. 
Before joining Time Warner, Mr. Barge served with Ernst & Young in
Los Angeles, where he was the Area Industry Leader of the Consumer Products
Group and a Regional Partner.Mr. Barge is a
Director, Chair of the Nominating and Governance Committee and Audit Committee
member of Scholastic Corporation, the world’s largest publisher and distributor
of children’s books.  He is a member of the Advisory Council for The SEC
Institute, a Distinguished Practitioner Lecturer for the Terry College of
Business at the University of Georgia and a member of the University of Georgia
Alumni Board.


James W. Barge: Executive Profile & Biography - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 23, 2017 4:53 AM ET
Media

Company Overview of Lions Gate Entertainment Corp.



SnapshotPeople 




OverviewBoard MembersCommittees



Executive Profile
James W. Barge  Chief Financial Officer, Lions Gate Entertainment Corp.AgeTotal Calculated CompensationThis person is connected to 3 Board Members in 3 different organizations across 9 different industries.See Board Relationships61$1,674,716As of Fiscal Year 2016
Background

		Mr. James W. Barge, also known as Jimmy, has been the Chief Financial Officer of Lions Gate Entertainment Corp. since October 1, 2013. Mr. Barge is the Chief Financial Officer at Lions Gate Entertainment, Inc. He served as the Chief Financial Officer and Executive Vice President of Viacom, Inc. from October 1, 2010 to November 2012 and served as its Executive Vice President of Tax & Treasury from January 22, 2008 to September 2010. He served as a Senior Vice President, ... Principal Accounting Officer and Controller of American Television and Communications Corporation. He served as Controller of Viacom, Inc. since March 10, 2008. He served as the Chief Accounting Officer at Viacom, Inc. until November 27, 2012. He served as Principal Accounting Officer of Historic TW, Inc. from 2002 to 2007 and as its Senior Vice President & Controller from 2002 to December 2007, Assistant Controller since March 1995 and also served as its Vice President. He served as Principal Accounting Officer, Senior Vice President and Controller at American Television and Communications Corporation. He served as Senior Vice President and Controller at Time Warner Inc. until December 2007 and also served as its Principal Accounting Officer. Prior to Time Warner, he served with Ernst & Young, where he served as an Area Industry Leader of the Consumer Products Group and a Partner in the West Region Accounting and Auditing Department. Prior to assuming his regional responsibilities in August of 1992, he served as a Partner in the National Office of Ernst & Young, where he was responsible for the resolution of SEC accounting and reporting issues for many of National Office of Ernst & Young's largest clients. Prior to his National office assignment, he was selected to participate in the highly regarded two-year Professional Accounting Fellow Program in the SEC's Office of the Chief Accountant in Washington DC. While at the SEC, he advised the Chief Accountant on wide range of policy issues, including the oversight of the accounting and disclosure issues. Prior to the SEC fellowship, he served a variety of clients in the Atlanta Office of Ernst & Young, including The Coca-Cola Company and Coca-Cola Enterprises. In 1982, he was selected to be a participant in Ernst & Young's International Program, where he worked in London Serving a wide variety of international clients. He has been a Director of Scholastic Corporation since 2007 and serves its Lead Independent Director September 21, 2015. He serves as a Director of The Advertising Council, Inc. He serves as a Board Member of the United Neighborhood Houses of New York. He is a Member of the Financial Executive Institute's Committee on Corporate Reporting, on the Advisory Council for the SEC Institute and a Distinguished Practitioner Lecturer for the Terry College of Business at the University of Georgia. He has served as Unit Chairman and Division Chairman in previous United Way campaigns. He served as a Board Member of Oralinqua School for the Hearing-Impaired in Los Angeles and the Auditory Education Clinic in Atlanta. Mr. Barge is a Member of the AICPA and the Georgia Society of Certified Public Accountant's and graduated summa cum laude from the University of Georgia in 1978 with a Bachelor's degree in Business Administration.Read Full Background




Corporate Headquarters
2700 Colorado AvenueSanta Monica, California 90404United StatesPhone: 310-449-9200Fax: --
Board Members Memberships
DirectorThe Advertising Council, Inc.DirectorUnited Neighborhood Houses2007-PresentLead Independent DirectorScholastic Corporation
Education
BBA 1978University of Georgia
Other Affiliations
Time Warner Inc.Scholastic CorporationHistoric TW Inc.American Television and Communications CorporationUniversity of GeorgiaLions Gate Entertainment, Inc.The Advertising Council, Inc.United Neighborhood HousesViacom, Inc.


Annual Compensation
Salary$837,500Total Annual Compensation$837,500
Stocks Options
Restricted Stock Awards$449,996All Other Compensation$4,470Exercisable Options$175,000Unexercisable Options$137,500Total Number of Options$312,500
Total Compensation
Total Annual Cash Compensation$841,970Total Short Term Compensation$837,500Other Long Term Compensation$454,466Total Calculated Compensation$1,674,716




Request Profile Update
















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



COMPETITOR COMPENSATIONNamePosition/CompanyCompensationRichard Lewis Gelfond Chief Executive Officer and DirectorIMAX Corporation$2.1MConstance Hee Lau CEO, President & DirectorHawaiian Electric Industries, Inc.$864.7KVincent K. McMahon Co-Founder, Chairman and Chief Executive OfficerWorld Wrestling Entertainment, Inc.$1.3MJoshua W. Sapan Chief Executive Officer and PresidentAMC Networks Inc.$2.0MMark  Zoradi Chief Executive Officer and DirectorCinemark Holdings, Inc.$816.0KCompensation as of Fiscal Year 2016.










Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Lions Gate Entertainment Corp., please visit .  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close



































James W. Barge - Executive Bio, Compensation History, and Contacts - Equilar Atlas










 

















Log in | Sign up








x

 






As Featured In



















James W. Barge
Chief Financial Officer at Lions Gate Entertainment Corp.


View Full Profile
Are you James W. Barge? Claim your profile


 


Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view James W. Barge's full profile. 
With Equilar Atlas, you can:



IDENTIFY corporate executives in James W. Barge's  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in James W. Barge's employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with James W. Barge through your network of contacts.
												








James W. Barge's Executive Work History


Current


Chief Financial Officer, 
Lions Gate Entertainment Corp.


Board Member, 
Scholastic Corporation


Past
To view James W. Barge's complete executive work history, sign up now
Education


														 Bachelor's, 
															University of Georgia


Age
61

 
 


James W. Barge's Biography



Mr. Barge is the Chief Financial Officer of Lions Gate Entertainment Corp., where he has oversight of all financial operations, planning and strategy and is a member of the Company's Executive Committee. From 2010 to 2012, he served as the Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer of Viacom Inc., having served as its Executive Vice President, Controller, Tax and Treasury since January 2008. He was the Senior Vice President, Controller and Chief Accounting Officer of Time Warner Inc. from 2002 to 2007. Prior to joining Time Warner in 1995, Mr. Barge held several positions at Ernst & Young, including Area Industry Leader of the Consumer ...
(Read More)

			Mr. Barge is the Chief Financial Officer of Lions Gate Entertainment Corp., where he has oversight of all financial operations, planning and strategy and is a member of the Company's Executive Committee. From 2010 to 2012, he served as the Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer of Viacom Inc., having served as its Executive Vice President, Controller, Tax and Treasury since January 2008. He was the Senior Vice President, Controller and Chief Accounting Officer of Time Warner Inc. from 2002 to 2007. Prior to joining Time Warner in 1995, Mr. Barge held several positions at Ernst & Young, including Area Industry Leader of the Consumer Products Group and a National Office partner, where he was responsible for the resolution of SEC accounting and reporting issues. Mr. Barge is an Emeritus member of the Alumni Board for the Terry College of Business at the University of Georgia.
		
Source: Scholastic Corporation on 07/28/2016
		
	

 






Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view James W. Barge's full profile. 



												By accessing Equilar Atlas, you can view bios, network, salary and wealth events
												of industry-leading executives like James W. Barge. More specifically, you'll be able to:
												

IDENTIFY corporate executives in James W. Barge's  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in James W. Barge's employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with James W. Barge through your network of conections.
												




View Full Profile


 








Search for over 360,000 executive profiles.





/bio



													Example: James W. Barge


















James W. Barge's Connections (110)





Sign up now to view James W. Barge's 110 connections »









Reuben Mark
Former Chairman and CEO, Colgate-Palmolive Company









Don Logan
Former Chairman, Media & Communications Group, Time Warner Inc.









Edward J. Zander
Board Member, Seagate Technology plc









Raymond G. Murphy
Board Member, Integra LifeSciences Holdings Corporation









Wayne H. Pace
Former EVP and CFO, Time Warner Inc.









Mae C. Jemison
Board Member, The Valspar Corporation









Sumner M. Redstone
Former Chairman Emeritus and Board Member, CBS Corporation









Blythe J. McGarvie
Board Member, LKQ Corporation









David A. Payne
Former Chief Product Officer, Gannett Co., Inc.









David M. Zaslav
Dir., President and Chief Executive Officer, Discovery Communications, Inc.








Popular Profiles






														Sign up now to view more executive profiles »
														









Thomas J. Lynch
Executive Chairman, TE Connectivity Ltd.









John J. Kita
EVP and CFO, A. O. Smith









Elon R. Musk
CEO and Chairman, Tesla









David J. O'Connor
President and CEO, The Madison Square Garden Company









Claiborne P. Deming
Chairman of the Board, Murphy Oil Corporation












×

Claim Your Profile Coming Soon
Interested in updating your biography and work history?
We're working on making it happen.
We'll email you when this feature is available.
Please enter valid email address.

Done


Thank you for your interest.
Ok






			Browse executive profiles:
			
				 A
			
				 B
			
				 C
			
				 D
			
				 E
			
				 F
			
				 G
			
				 H
			
				 I
			
				 J
			
				 K
			
				 L
			
				 M
			
				 N
			
				 O
			
				 P
			
				 Q
			
				 R
			
				 S
			
				 T
			
				 U
			
				 V
			
				 W
			
				 X
			
				 Y
			
				 Z



Equilar Homepage
Equilar Atlas
Equilar Insight
Equilar BoardEdge
Equilar Engage
Research Services
Knowledge Network
About Us
Login

� 2017 Equilar All Rights Reserved. Privacy Policy
1100 Marshall Street, Redwood City, CA 94063 | Phone (650) 241-6600 | Fax (650) 701-0993




























James W. Barge










































United States




Sign In






































HOME










 James W. Barge















 























Chief Financial Officer & EVP, Viacom, Inc.
Jimmy Barge is the executive vice president, chief financial officer
  of Viacom, Inc. In this role, Mr. Barge is responsible for overseeing
  all aspects of the company’s financial planning, reporting and
  analysis, global tax and cash management strategies as well as
  Viacom’s information technology and risk management activities. He
  joined Viacom in January of 2008.

 Prior to joining Viacom, Mr. Barge was the senior vice
  president and controller of Time Warner and was responsible for Time
  Warner’s overall financial planning, reporting and analysis, including
  budgeting and long range planning, and led several shared service and
  global process improvement initiatives. He joined Time Warner in March
  of 1995 as assistant controller.

 Before joining Time Warner, Mr. Barge was with Ernst &
  Young, where he was the area industry leader of the Consumer Products
  Group and a partner in the West Region Accounting and Auditing
  Department. During that period, he had regional responsibility for
  consultations with clients across all industries, including a heavy
  concentration of high-tech clients in Silicon Valley, on a wide
  variety of accounting and SEC-related matters.

 Prior to assuming his regional responsibilities in August of
  1992, Mr. Barge was a partner in the national office of Ernst &
  Young, where he was responsible for the resolution of SEC accounting
  and reporting issues for many of the firm's largest clients. He also
  served as Ernst & Young’s liaison with the SEC.
Prior to his national office assignment, Mr. Barge was selected to
  participate in the Professional Accounting Fellow Program in the SEC’s
  Office of the Chief Accountant in Washington, D.C. Prior to the SEC
  fellowship, Mr. Barge served a variety of clients in the Atlanta
  office of Ernst & Young, including The Coca-Cola Company and
  Coca-Cola Enterprises. In 1982, he was selected as a participant in
  Ernst & Young’s international program, where he worked in London
  serving a wide variety of international clients.

 Mr. Barge is a director, chair of the Nominating and Governance
  Committee and Audit Committee member of Scholastic Corporation, the
  world’s largest publisher and distributor of children’s books and a
  leader in educational technology. Scholastic Corporation is a NASDAQ
  listed company.
He is also a board member and treasurer for two non-profit
  organizations, United Neighborhood Houses (UNH) of New York, which
  provides neighborhood-based social services in the New York area, and
  The Ad Council, whose public service advertising raises awareness and
  promotes action on significant public issues.

 Mr. Barge is a member of the Advisory Council for The SEC
  Institute and past member of the Financial Executive Institute’s
  Committee on Corporate Reporting. He is also a distinguished
  practitioner lecturer for the Terry College of Business at the
  University of Georgia and a member of the alumni board. Mr. Barge
  graduated summa cum laude from the University of Georgia with a degree
  in business administration and is a member of the AICPA.
 
















KPMG.com (US) 
             |
            KPMG International
             |
            Accessibility


  
  
  
  
  
  
  

 Legal
        |
        Privacy 
        |
        Terms of Use 
 © 2016 KPMG LLP, a Delaware limited liability partnership and the U.S. member firm of the KPMG network of independent member firms affiliated with KPMG International Cooperative, a Swiss entity. All rights reserved.


















James Williams Barge - Old Greenwich, CT | Intelius



























Sign In



We found James Williams Barge in Old Greenwich, CT


James Williams Barge

                                                                           Intelius found that James Williams Barge  is  a male between 60 and 70 years old from Old Greenwich, CT.  We have connected them to
                8 addresses,
                2 phones,
                and 3 relatives or associates.
         





Also Known As

James S Barge
James D Barge


Get Report Now

Age

James Williams Barge is in his 60s

James Has Lived In

Old Greenwich, CT
Brooklyn, NY
Highlands, NC

James's Relatives

Jamie Barge
Andrew Barge
Susan Barge







James Williams Barge



Zodiac SignLeo



GenderMale



Get Report Now










Want to know more about James? Get a comprehensive background report, find full phone numbers, and other contact information when available, all from billions of available public records.
            Continue below for more details about James, or use our people search engine to find others.
Get Background Check on James Williams Barge
Get a Criminal Check on James Williams Barge
Get a Public Record Report on James Williams Barge
Get a People Search Report on James Williams Barge


James Williams Barge's Contact Information
Known Cities Lived In
Find out where James Williams Barge has lived as well as James Williams Barge's phone numbers and email addresses.




James Williams Barge Has Lived in 5 States
Connecticut Address for James Williams Barge


5 G***** R* 

Old Greenwich, CT


Has Lived In

Old Greenwich, CT
Brooklyn, NY


Get Full Address Report










Phone Numbers Associated with James Williams Barge

(310) ***-**** - Malibu, CA 
(818) ***-**** - Pasadena, CA 


Get Full Phone Report



Email Addresses Associated with James Williams Barge



Get Email Report




James Williams Barge's Social Network and Potential Email Matches
Find out potential social network profiles and potential email usernamed for James Williams Barge


James Williams Barge's known Social Networks And Potential Email Matches

Find all of James Williams Barge's Social Network Profiles

Get Full Report

Search Social Networks
Including Facebook, LinkedIn, MySpace, Google, Twitter, Yahoo, Jigsaw, ZoomInfo and more



Potential Email Matches
James Barge
Username Matches

                  JamesBarge
                  BargeJames
                  James.Barge
                  Barge.James
                  James_Barge
                  Barge_James
                  James-Barge
                  Barge-James
                  JBarge
               


Popular Email Services

@gmail.com
@aol.com
@yahoo.com
@comcast.net
@hotmail.com
@msn.com
@rocketmail.com
@att.net
@sbcglobal.net
@ymail.com
@facebook.com
@mail.com
@bellsouth.net
@live.com
@earthlink.net
@cox.net
@prodigy.net
@me.com
@peoplepc.com
@juno.com
@rediffmail.com
@mindspring.com
@comcast.com
@charter.net
@outlook.com




All trademarks, product names, company names or logos on this page are the property of their respective owners.
Related People Searches
J Barge







         Intelius is a leading provider of public data about people and their connections to others. Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the Fair Credit Reporting Act (FCRA). This site should not be used to determine an individual’s eligibility for credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose covered by the FCRA. For employment or tenant screening services, please visit our partner Talentwise.
      

About Us
Site Map
About Our Reports
Blog
Help
Contact Us

© 2003 – 2017 PeopleConnect, Inc. d/b/a Intelius. All Rights Reserved.
         Privacy Policy - UPDATED
Terms of Service - UPDATED






What is the FCRA?
The Fair Credit Reporting Act ("FCRA") is a federal law that promotes the accuracy, fairness and privacy of information in the files of consumer reporting agencies.
Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the FCRA. Intelius reports cannot be used for background checks related to consumer credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose
                  prohibited under the FCRA.
You may not use any information obtained from Intelius for any purpose covered by the FCRA.
Find out more about the FCRA here.

















James W. Barge. - Free Online Library










Printer Friendly




	30,217,446 articles and books



Periodicals
Literature





Keyword
Title
Author
Topic













The Free Library > Business and Industry > Banking, finance and accounting > Financial Executive > October 1, 2006
The Free Library > Business and Industry > Business > Financial Executive > October 1, 2006
The Free Library
    > Date > 
    
2006 > 
        
        
        October > 
        
        
        1 > 
        
        Financial Executive









James W. Barge.


Link/Page Citation



Page/Link:
	Page URL:
	

	HTML link:
	<a href="https://www.thefreelibrary.com/James+W.+Barge.-a0153309356</a>

Citations:

MLA style: "James W. Barge.." The Free Library. 2006 Financial Executives International 23 Jul. 2017 https://www.thefreelibrary.com/James+W.+Barge.-a0153309356
Chicago style: The Free Library. S.v. James W. Barge.." Retrieved Jul 23 2017 from  https://www.thefreelibrary.com/James+W.+Barge.-a0153309356
APA style: James W. Barge.. (n.d.) >The Free Library. (2014). Retrieved Jul 23 2017 from  https://www.thefreelibrary.com/James+W.+Barge.-a0153309356



 As a youngster playing touch football in the streets of Southwest
Atlanta, Jimmy Barge had no thoughts of future college and/or a career.
A $500 scholarship--associated with an "Employee of the Year"
award, while working at Six Flags Over Georgia--led to more serious
college considerations. That was followed by his graduating with honors,
and a career, which began in public accounting and finance.

 Goes by: Jimmy

 Title: Senior Vice President & Controller

 Company: Time Warner; media & communications

 Born: Atlanta, Ga.; Aug. 3, 1955

 Spouse: Susan, for 26 years

 Children: Andrew, 22; Jamie, 20

 Education: BBA, University of Georgia, Summa Cum Laude, 1978

 Career Summary: 1971-77, Six Flags Over Georgia, Senior Operations
Supervisor, Atlanta; 1978-95, held a variety of positions with Ernst
& Young in Atlanta, Washington, D.C., and Los Angeles, including
1982-83, Ernst & Young, International Exchange Program, London,
England and the last position as Partner and Area Leader--Consumer
Products in Los Angeles. From 1988-90, I was with the U.S. Securities
and Exchange Commission Professional Accounting Fellowship Program, in
the Office of the Chief Accountant, in Washington, D.C.; Joined Time
Warner in New York as Assistant Controller in March 1995 and have rise
through a variety of roles to where I am currently Senior Vice President
and Controller.

 [ILLUSTRATION OMITTED]

 Board of Director Service: Numerous Time Warner entities in my
capacity as a corporate officer, and United Neighborhood Houses of New
York, a nonprofit organization in New York.

 FEI Chapter: New York City Chapter; member since September 1996;
serve on FEI's Committee for Corporate Reporting (CCR).

 Leisure: Running, golf, sailing, skiing, adventure sports and
travel. I've run in four marathons, and my wife and children have
strategically placed themselves at the 20-mile mark, a part in the race
where runners often "hit the wall." My personal best time was
in New York, but I am most proud of having run the last mile of the 2000
Boston Marathon in 7 minutes, 27 seconds, finishing three seconds under
the "Male Over 40" qualifying time!

 Family vacations have included travel in India, China, Kenya and
Turkey and skiing in Europe. My idea of a "cruise" is a
45-foot bareboat charter in the Bahamas.

 Time Management: Excellent executive assistant and direct reports
make it look easy.

 Stress Management: No problem; I start most days with a 5:30 am
six-mile run.

 Recently-read Book: The World is Flat by Thomas L. Friedman.
Globalization will have an increasingly significant impact on the way we
live and work.

 If I could, I'd spend one hour with: Tiger Woods, because
Jackie Robinson, Mother Teresa, Martin Luther King and Mahatma Gandhi
are deceased.

 Who is your hero? My son and daughter. They have both overcome
significant hearing impairments and are chasing their respective dreams
in a fully mainstreamed world.

 The best advice I've ever received: Get your priorities in
order: Religion (moral beliefs), family and career; then make sure you
take care of the first two so you can excel in the third.

 Favorite Job/s: Current job and partner with Ernst & Young.
Time Warner is an incredibly exciting place to work, and my former
partners at Ernst & Young were always a great source of professional
inspiration.

 Worst Job: Throwing Sunday morning papers. The papers seemed to
weigh more than I did.

 Favorite Deal: Acquisition of Turner Broadcasting. This $6 billion
acquisition merged CNN and the Turner family of networks with the
content of Time Warner, forming one of the greatest media and
entertainment companies in the world.

 If I could change something: We would all be more accepting of one
another.

 As a child, I expected I'd grow up to be: A major league
baseball player.

 Quotable: "Common sense and conventional wisdom are
oxymorons."

 Select comments: I have always had the great fortune to work with a
talented group of people (well, perhaps with one or two exceptions!)
with the support of a loving family, for which I will remain forever
grateful.

 Email: James.Barge@timewarner.com




COPYRIGHT 2006 Financial Executives International
  No portion of this article can be reproduced without the express written permission from the copyright holder.
  
Copyright 2006, Gale Group. All rights reserved. Gale Group is a Thomson Corporation Company.








Article Details

Printer friendly
Cite/link
Email
Feedback
Title Annotation:balanceSHEET
Publication:Financial ExecutiveArticle Type:Biography
Date:Oct 1, 2006
Words:661Previous Article:Names in the news.Next Article:Credit Rating Agency Reform law attests to FEI's influence.
Topics:
Entertainment industry
Officials and employees




Related Articles
AREA FISHING BARGES EXTINCT; ISLE OF REDONDO WAS LAST OPEN.
The fire still burns: a new one-man show and television documentary remind us that the life and work of James Baldwin continue to resonate.
My name is Bill: Bill Wilson: his life and the creation of Alcoholics Anonymous.
Benefit offers a helping of the blues, heavy on the harp.
The Quander Quality.








Publications by NamePublications by DateAuthorsLiterature


A-D
E-O
P-T
U-Z

before 1995
1995-1999
2000-2004
2005-2009
2010-

A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z 
A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z 

Terms of use |
	Copyright © 2017 Farlex, Inc. |
	Feedback |
	For webmasters

 









Business and Industry: Banking, finance and accounting: Financial Executive - Free Online Library







Printer Friendly




	30,217,446 articles and books



Periodicals
Literature





Keyword
Title
Author
Topic













The Free Library > Business and Industry > Banking, finance and accounting > Financial Executive
The Free Library > Business and Industry > Business > Financial Executive





Browse Financial Executive by date
Financial Executive is an award-winning flagship publication of Financial Executives International (FEI). Financial Executive delivers news and analysis about business finance 10 times per year. Articles are about accounting, auditing, treasury management risk management, financing, financial reporting, corporate restructuring, mergers and acquisitions, pension fund management, tax strategies, investment strategy, insurance, e-commerce, competitive strategy, hedging and other financial transactions, venture capital, international finance, international financial reporting standards (IFRS), U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), international trade issues, competitive issues, information technology (IT), strategic planning, budgeting, performance measurement, employee benefits, executive compensation and benefits, medical plans, and career strategies.
2015
Jan 1, Mar 22
2014
Jan 1, Mar 22, Jun 22, Sep 22
2013
Jan 1, Mar 1, Apr 1, May 1, Jun 1, Jul 1, Sep 1, Oct 1, Nov 1, Dec 1
2012
Jan 1, Mar 1, Apr 1, May 1, Jun 1, Jul 1, Sep 1, Oct 1, Nov 1, Dec 1
2011
Jan 1, Mar 1, Apr 1, May 1, Jun 1, Jul 1, Sep 1, Oct 1, Nov 1, Dec 1
2010
Jan 1, Mar 1, Apr 1, May 1, Jun 1, Jul 1, Sep 1, Oct 1, Nov 1, Dec 1
2009
Jan 1, Mar 1, Apr 1, May 1, Jun 1, Jul 1, Sep 1, Oct 1, Nov 1, Dec 1
2008
Jan 1, Mar 1, Apr 1, May 1, Jun 1, Jul 1, Sep 1, Oct 1, Nov 1, Dec 1
2007
Jan 1, Mar 1, Apr 1, May 1, Jun 1, Jul 1, Sep 1, Oct 1, Nov 1, Dec 1
2006
Jan 1, Mar 1, Apr 1, May 1, Jun 1, Jul 1, Sep 1, Oct 1, Nov 1, Dec 1
2005
Jan 1, Mar 1, Apr 1, May 1, Jun 1, Jul 1, Sep 1, Oct 1, Nov 1, Dec 1
2004
Jan 1, Mar 1, May 1, Jun 1, Jul 1, Sep 1, Oct 1, Nov 1, Dec 1
2003
Jan 1, Mar 1, Jun 1, Jul 1, Sep 1, Oct 1, Nov 1, Dec 1
2002
Jan 1, Mar 1, May 1, Jun 1, Jul 1, Sep 1, Oct 1, Nov 1, Dec 1
2001
Jan 1, Mar 1, May 1, Jun 1, Jul 1, Sep 1, Oct 1, Nov 1, Dec 1
2000
Jan 1, Mar 1, May 1, Jul 1, Sep 1, Nov 1
1999
Jan 1, Mar 1, May 1, Jul 1, Sep 1, Nov 1
1998
Mar 1, May 1, Jul 1, Sep 1, Nov 1
1997
Jan 1, Mar 1, May 1, Jul 1, Sep 1, Nov 1
1996
Jan 1, Mar 1, May 1, Jul 1, Sep 1, Nov 1
1995
Mar 1, Jul 1, Nov 1
1994
Jan 1, Mar 1, May 1, Jul 1, Sep 1, Nov 1
1993
Jan 1, Mar 1, May 1, Jul 1, Sep 1, Nov 1
1992
Jan 1, Mar 1, May 1, Jul 1, Sep 1, Nov 1
1991
Jan 1, Mar 1, May 1, Jul 1, Sep 1, Nov 1
1990
Mar 1, May 1, Jul 1, Sep 1, Nov 1
1989
Jan 1, Mar 1, May 1, Jul 1, Sep 1, Nov 1







Publications by NamePublications by DateAuthorsLiterature


A-D
E-O
P-T
U-Z

before 1995
1995-1999
2000-2004
2005-2009
2010-

A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z 
A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z 

Terms of use |
	Copyright © 2017 Farlex, Inc. |
	Feedback |
	For webmasters

 









Financial Executive: October 1, 2006 - Free Online Library







Printer Friendly




	30,217,446 articles and books



Periodicals
Literature





Keyword
Title
Author
Topic













The Free Library > Business and Industry > Banking, finance and accounting > Financial Executive > October 1, 2006
The Free Library > Business and Industry > Business > Financial Executive > October 1, 2006
The Free Library
    > Date > 
    
2006 > 
        
        
        October > 
        
        
        1 > 
        
        Financial Executive
    







Articles from Financial Executive (October 1, 2006)
1-39 out of 39 article(s)  

Title 
Author
Type
Words

ACL Services Ltd.


341

Are foreign issuers shunning the U.S.? Lots of rumors suggest that's happening, and there is some evidence that listings here have suffered in the wake of Sarbanes-Oxley. But the situation is complicated, and more than just rules are involved.
Marshall, Jeffrey

2978

Ask FERF about ... the Pension Protection Act of 2006.
de Mesa Graziano, Cheryl

719

Automating treasury management to maximize liquidity.
Kane, Jay

760

Business Propulsion Systems Inc.

Brief article
206

Buyers guide.

Buyers guide
743

Canadian unit formed to aid internal auditors.
Heffes, Ellen M.
Brief article
204

CFO 'must-have' skills: risk / compliance / strategy; Whether you're a CFO now or aspire to be one, you need to make certain you've got your skills "down pat" in three key areas. Then you can navigate market changes and embrace governance to improve stockholder value.
McCarthy, Mary Pat

1879

CODA Group plc.


404

CPC offers letter on standard-setting.


255

Crossword.
Mellor, Myles

206

CXS.

Brief article
174

Eliminating productivity roadblocks: overcoming the top barriers to improved U.S. productivity--poor management, poor leadership and poor communication--all involve people, and need to be part of every senior manager's mindset.
Klempa, Miklos

2030

Executive assimilation suspect, survey finds.
Heffes, Ellen M.

302

Fair value, Sarbanes-Oxley focus of FERF program.

Brief article
260

Focus on performance shines light on CFOs.
Heffes, Ellen M.

341

From the editor.
Marshall, Jeffrey
Editorial
575

How CFOs can ensure the future viability of finance: CFOs are finding increased expectations for oversight and transparency, along with rising stakes to grow the business faster. As a result, they must build leadership depth and breadth in their staffs, tapping people with the capability of balancing these competing tensions.
Boyle, John

1879

James W. Barge.

Biography
661

Juicing the Orange: How to Turn Creativity into a Powerful Business Advantage.
Marshall, Jeffrey
Book review
206

Latin American firms getting funding in US.
Heffes, Ellen M.

362

Leasing back on FASB's agenda; ED likely in '09.
Heffes, Ellen M.

1462

Movaris Inc.


305

Names in the news.


464

New tax rules boost captive insurance for smaller firms.
Potter, Howard H.

782

No longer just gray: business journalism takes off; Technology, public appetite and far more sophistication in delivery have conspired to radically transform the face of business journalism in recent decades. That's been both good and bad, with many in the profession itself bemoaning a focus on entertainment instead of information.
Millman, Gregory J.
Column
3768

Options backdating: plenty to worry about; More than 80 companies are being probed for alleged abuse of backdating. Two attorneys review what's been happening and offer tips on what CFOs should do if they think company is at risk.
Raskin, Kenneth A.

1633

Private companies: in pursuit of sustainable growth.
Sinnett, William M.

4568

Private Company Forum program set for Oct. 26-7.


272

Profit with Honor: The New Stage of Market Capitalism.
Marshall, Jeffrey
Book review
367

Sarbanes-Oxley helps cost of capital: study.
Heffes, Ellen M.

325

Section 404 blog cited in other blog sites.


95

SmartPros offers online training to members in transition.

Brief article
108

Taking Advice: How Leaders Get Good Counsel and Use It Wisely.
Marshall, Jeffrey
Book review
224

Ten best practices for audit committees: the public company audit committee now has an enhanced role and needs to revise some of its practices. Here are some key areas to focus on.
Lipman, Frederick D.

1926

Terrorism risk: more coverage, lower rates.
Heffes, Ellen M.

394

The players are in place. Now, what's topping the agenda?
DiFabio, Christine
Column
776

Unlocking greater profitability from receivables management: executing well on three basic processes can do a lot to clear disputes, reduce outstanding invoices and ensure a better revenue stream.
Salek, John G.

1192

Where IT accounting raises compliance issues.
Gordon, Scott

1574







Publications by NamePublications by DateAuthorsLiterature


A-D
E-O
P-T
U-Z

before 1995
1995-1999
2000-2004
2005-2009
2010-

A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z 
A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z 

Terms of use |
	Copyright © 2017 Farlex, Inc. |
	Feedback |
	For webmasters

 








Lionsgate Picks James Barge To Succeed James Keegan As CFO   | Deadline

























































 





































 














































  




Menu

Deadline
FilmLionsgate Picks James Barge To Succeed James Keegan As CFO 

 


























 







			Breaking News		


					Frank Miller On Why Superhero Films Are Better Than Ever				








Top Stories




Comic-Con: Marvel Shows Off Thor, Black Panther & More





Comic-Con: Watch ‘Stranger Things’ S2 & Other Trailers




Box Office 
‘Dunkirk’ Eyes $51M+ Open; ‘Valerian’ Earth-Bound $16M
by by The Deadline Team





Film 
John Heard Dies: Dad From ‘Home Alone’, ‘Sopranos’ Cop
by by The Deadline Team








Film
Lionsgate Picks James Barge To Succeed James Keegan As CFO


by The Deadline Team

September 20, 2013 5:35am



















					1				








































					Film				



					Lionsgate				

 



SANTA MONICA, CA, September 20, 2013 – Lionsgate Chief Financial Officer James Keegan, a 25-year veteran of Lionsgate (NYSE: LGF) and its predecessor companies, has announced his retirement effective October 1, 2013. The Company has asked him to remain as a consultant until January 3, 2014 to assist with the transition to his successor.
James W. Barge has been named Chief Financial Officer effective October 1, reporting to Lionsgate Chief Executive Officer Jon Feltheimer. Barge served as Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of Viacom Inc. from 2010-2012 and Executive Vice President, Controller, Tax and Treasury, from 2008-2010. He previously had a 13-year tenure at Time Warner, ultimately serving as Time Warner Senior Vice President, Controller and Chief Accounting Officer. Prior to his tenure at Viacom and Time Warner, Barge spent 13 years at Ernst & Young, where he rose to the positions of industry leader of the Consumer Products Group and Regional Partner.
“Jim Keegan has provided 25 years of exemplary service to the Lionsgate family, and he will be missed,” said Feltheimer. “When he decided to retire, we were fortunate that Jimmy Barge was already working with us on a number of financial initiatives and was available to hit the ground running as our new CFO. Jimmy has tremendous experience guiding the financial operations and strategies of leading major entertainment companies, and he will be a valuable and experienced addition to our management team.”
Keegan led Lionsgate’s financial team during a period in which the Company continues to significantly delever its balance sheet, paying down its $500 million Summit term loan more than two years early and refinancing most of its other debt. Lionsgate announced a new five-year, $800 million revolving credit facility with a JPMorgan-led syndicate of banks last year. The Company reported its best financial results ever in the fiscal year ended March 31, 2013.
Barge is a member of the Advisory Council for the SEC Institute and a past member of the Financial Executive Institute’s Committee on Corporate Reporting. He also serves as chair of the Nominating and Governance Committees of the Board of Directors of Scholastic Corporation. A summa cum laude graduate of the University of Georgia, he is a distinguished practitioner lecturer for the University of Georgia’s Terry College of Business and is a member of the University of Georgia Alumni Board.





 Subscribe to Deadline Breaking News Alerts and keep your inbox happy


















				1			



















1 Comment






redintheface • 						on  Sep 20, 2013 6:03 am


Jim Keegan: great guy, friend, employee. “True comment, true comment”
































What's Hot on Deadline 
1
Jake Paul Exits Disney Channel Series 'Bizaardvark'


2
'Avengers: Infinity War' Is Marvel's Grand Finale At Hall H Presentation - Comic-Con


3
'Dunkirk' Flying To $51M; 'Girls Trip' Driving To $28M+; 'Valerian' Still A Disaster With $16M+


4
Disney Channel's 'Descendants 2' Draws 13 Million Viewers Across 6 Networks


5
'The Flash' Season 4 Trailer: Get Ready For A New-Look Team Flash On The CW


6
Linkin Park Filmed 'Carpool Karaoke' Episode Days Before Chester Bennington's Death


7
'The Originals' Season 5 Teaser: First Look At Teenage Hope In Final Season -- Comic-Con


8
'Gotham' Season 4 Trailer: Crystal Reed Cast As Sofia Falcone - Comic-Con


9
'Thor: Ragnarok' Trailer Stomps Into Hall H With Battling Superheroes - Comic-Con


10
Warner Bros Confirms DC Universe Pic Titles: 'Wonder Woman II', 'Flashpoint' & More - Comic-Con

Latest Film News




 
						‘Avengers: Infinity War’ Is Marvel’s Grand Finale At Hall H Presentation – Comic-Con					





 
						Marvel’s ‘Black Panther’ Leaves A Big Footprint In Hall H – Comic-Con					





 
						‘Thor: Ragnarok’ Trailer Stomps Into Hall H With Battling Superheroes – Comic-Con					





 
						‘Captain Marvel’: Samuel L. Jackson Confirmed As Nick Fury & He’ll Look Different in 1990s-Set Pic…					





 
						Michelle Pfeiffer Is Janet Van Dyne In ‘Ant-Man And The Wasp’ – Comic-Con					





 
						Daniel Stern Pays Tribute To ‘Home Alone’ Co-Star John Heard					





More


 
Marketplace




















 








Featured Jobs

Creative Development CoordinatorTriptyk Studios, New York, New York
Account/Project Coordinator (Ad Agency)
Petrol Advertising, Burbank, California

Media Specialist
Bridgewater Associates, Westport, Connecticut

Executive Director, Aspen Film
Company Confidential, Aspen, Colorado

Associate Director, YouTuber & Gamer Partnerships
Save the Children, Fairfield, Connecticut

SEE MORE JOBS




































ad

































































































































































James Barge – CFO Moves 





































CFO MovesTracking CFO Movement Across the USA
CFO Moves – week ending September 20, 2013
Posted on September 23, 2013 Written by Dergel CFO Admin Leave a Comment CFO Moves this week include:



Simply Hired
Starbucks Corporation 
Lionsgate 


Norfolk Southern Corp. 
NVIDIA 
Ralph Lauren Corporation 


Lipocine Inc. 
PCTEL, Inc. 
Flurry


InVivo Therapeutics Holdings Corp. 
Greenbelt Resources Corporation 
Hot Mama’s Foods, Inc. 


Washington Trust Bancorp, Inc.
Sterling Construction Company, Inc. 
Ingram Micro Inc. 


LogicSource
LLBH Private Wealth Management, LLC 
Emulex Corporation


Billtrust
ConvergeOne
GAIN Capital Holdings, Inc. 


Northrop Grumman Corporation 
Commercial Vehicle Group, Inc. 
KaloBios Pharmaceuticals, Inc. 


Magellan Midstream Partners, L.P. 
SWS Group, Inc. 
Trevena, Inc. 


Five Star Products, Inc. 
Axcelis Technologies, Inc. 
Children’s Hospitals and Clinics of Minnesota 


PENSCO
DeliverLean
Odyssey Marine Exploration, Inc. 


GoHealth
Cordia Bancorp Inc. 
Tenex Health 


Baxano Surgical, Inc. 
VHA Inc. 
Advanced Cannabis Solutions, Inc. 


Barton Malow Company 
STRONG, LLC 
Severstal North America


myoscience, inc.





Would you like to receive our weekly CFO Moves directly in your email? Click the SIGN ME UP! button on the right of the blog page.
Should you have any CFO Moves to report, please email us.
CFO Moves is published by Samuel Dergel (Executive Search Consultant and CFO & Financial Executive Search Specialist with Stanton Chase International). Samuel can be reached by email at s.dergel@stantonchase.com or by phone at +1 (415) 738-2070.
+ + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + +
Simply Hired announced the appointment of Shelly Schaffer as Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer. Before joining Simply Hired, Schaffer served as Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer at Support.com. Prior to Support.com, she served as Vice President of Corporate Operations Finance at Yahoo! Inc. Schaffer also worked as an executive at Mercury Interactive in a number of finance roles of increasing responsibility from September 2003 to December 2006 during which period it was acquired by Hewlett Packard. These roles included Vice President of Strategic Finance and Treasury and Vice President of Financial Planning and Analysis. Earlier in her career, Schaffer held a range of senior finance roles with The Coca Cola Company, Nestle Beverage Company and Cosine Communications. 
Starbucks Corporation (NASDAQ: SBUX) announced that Troy Alstead, chief financial officer and chief administrative officer, has been promoted to chief financial officer and group president, Global Business Services. Alstead joined Starbucks in January 1992 when it was a privately held company with just over 100 stores.
Lionsgate announced that its Chief Financial Officer, James Keegan, has announced his retirement effective October 1, 2013. The Company has asked him to remain as a consultant until January 3, 2014 to assist with the transition to his successor. James W. Barge has been named Chief Financial Officer effective October 1. Barge served as Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of Viacom Inc. from 2010-2012 and Executive Vice President, Controller, Tax and Treasury, from 2008-2010.  He previously had a 13-year tenure at Time Warner, ultimately serving as Time Warner Senior Vice President, Controller and Chief Accounting Officer. Prior to his tenure at Viacom and Time Warner, Barge spent 13 years at Ernst & Young, where he rose to the positions of industry leader of the Consumer Products Group and Regional Partner.
Norfolk Southern Corp. (NYSE: NSC) announced that Marta R. Stewart has been named executive vice president and chief financial officer, effective Nov. 1. Stewart succeeds John P. Rathbone, who will retire Nov.1, after a 32-year career in the finance and administrative divisions at Norfolk Southern. Stewart joined Norfolk Southern in 1983 and served in several finance positions before being named vice president and controller in 2003 and then vice president and treasurer in 2009.
NVIDIA (NASDAQ: NVDA) announced that it has named Colette Kress as executive vice president and chief financial officer. Kress most recently served for three years as senior vice president and chief financial officer at Cisco’s Business Technology and Operations Finance organization. Previously, she spent 13 years at Microsoft, including four years as chief financial officer of the Server and Tools division, and held senior roles in corporate planning and finance. Prior to that, she served at Texas Instruments in a variety of finance positions.
Ralph Lauren Corporation (NYSE: RL) announced that Christopher Peterson, currently Senior Vice President (SVP) and Chief Financial Officer (CFO), will become Executive Vice President and Chief Administrative Officer (CAO) in addition to his role as CFO. Mr. Peterson has been SVP and CFO of the Company since September 2012.  Before joining Ralph Lauren, Mr. Peterson spent 20 years at The Procter & Gamble Company in several senior corporate and operational roles. Most recently, he was CFO of its Global Household Care division.
Lipocine Inc. (OTC: LPCN) announced that Morgan Brown has joined the Company as Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer (“CFO”). Most recently, Mr. Brown was the CFO at Innovus Pharmaceuticals, Inc. Previously Mr. Brown was the CFO of World Heart Corporation and Lifetree Clinical Research and the Vice President, Finance and Treasurer of NPS Pharmaceuticals, Inc. Before NPS Pharmaceuticals Mr. Brown was a Senior Manager at KPMG LLP. 
PCTEL, Inc. (NASDAQ: PCTI) announced that John Schoen, PCTEL’s current and long-time CFO, has been promoted to Senior Vice President and CFO. Schoen has served as the company’s CFO since November 2001. Schoen began his career in public accounting at Ernst and Young before spending nearly 20 years at Motorola, where he held both financial and operational positions. He served as Safco Technology’s CFO and maintained those responsibilities after Agilent’s acquisition of Safco.
Flurry announced the appointment of Bob Komin as its Chief Financial Officer. Bob has held several executive positions, most recently as CFO at Ticketfly, and previously as COO and CFO at Linden Labs, CFO at Solexel, CFO at Tellme Networks (acquired by Microsoft) and prior to that as VP of Finance and Treasurer at Convergys and Cincinnati Bell.
InVivo Therapeutics Holdings Corp. announced that Gregory D. Perry has been appointed as interim CFO, commencing September 23, 2013. Mr. Perry was most recently the Executive Vice President and CFO of Immunogen, Inc. Prior to joining Immunogen, Mr. Perry served as CFO of Elixir Pharmaceuticals, Inc. from 2007 to 2009. Prior to Elixir, he was CFO of Domantis Ltd., which was acquired by GlaxoSmithKline in 2006. Previously, Mr. Perry was Senior Vice President and CFO of Transkaryotic Therapies, Inc. until its acquisition by Shire plc in 2005. Mr. Perry is currently a member of the Board of Directors of Advanced Cell Technology, Inc.
Greenbelt Resources Corporation (OTC: GRCO) announced the appointment of Joseph Pivinski to the executive team as interim chief financial officer. Joe served previously as CFO and senior vice president at NASDAQ-listed Consolidated Water Co., Ltd., and as vice president of finance and CFO for Oriole Homes Corp. Joe has also held various similar C-level and board positions with other public and private companies, including the U.S. subsidiary of Adecco.
Hot Mama’s Foods, Inc. (OTC: HOTF) announced that William Kenealy has joined as Chief Financial Officer (CFO). From 2010 to 2013, Bill was Chief Financial Officer of Compact Industries, Inc. Prior to that, Bill worked at Reserve Brands, Inc. as Senior Vice-President and CFO from 2007 to 2009. From 2006 to 2007 he was a consultant/interim CFO for public and privately held operating companies and private equity firms.
Washington Trust Bancorp, Inc. (NASDAQ: WASH), the publicly-owned holding company of The Washington Trust Company, announced David V. Devault has been promoted to Vice Chairman, Secretary and Chief Financial Officer.
Sterling Construction Company, Inc. (NASDAQ: STRL) announced that Thomas R. Wright has been named Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer effective September 25, 2013 and that Kevan Blair will assume the role of Senior Vice President of Corporate Finance following his stint as interim CFO. Mr. Wright was most recently Chief Financial Officer of Toronto-based St Marys/CBM, which he joined in 2011. Between 2006 and 2010, Mr. Wright was with Boart Longyear. He began his career at Boart as Vice President of Global Products and Manufacturing, and was later promoted to Vice President, Financial Planning and Analysis, Mergers and Acquisitions, Investor Relations, Strategic Planning and Corporate Communication. Before joining Boart, Mr. Wright was Director of Corporate Financial Planning and Analysis for a leading North American quick-serve restaurant company, Wendy’s International. Earlier in his career, Mr. Wright held increasingly responsible positions in the finance areas of Bank One Corporation (now JP Morgan Chase Company) and Allied Signal Incorporated (now Honeywell International Inc.).
Ingram Micro Inc. (NYSE: IM) announced the appointment of Paul Read as president and chief operating officer, effective Sept. 30, 2013. Read, who joined the Ingram Micro board of directors last September, has resigned his role as a member effective immediately. From June 1995 to June 2013, Read was with Flextronics Inc. serving most recently as chief financial officer and executive vice president. Previously he served as the company’s executive vice president of finance for worldwide operations. Prior to joining Flextronics in 1995, he held various senior financial positions in the United Kingdom with Allied Steel and Wire, STI Telecommunications and Associated British Foods.
LogicSource announced the appointment of Greg Hunt, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer of Apollo Investment Corporation, to its Board of Directors.
LLBH Private Wealth Management, LLC announced the appointment of Jeff Fuhrman as its Chief Operating Officer and Chief Financial Officer. Most recently, Fuhrman spent nearly a decade as President and Chief Operating Officer of IMG Artists. Previously, Fuhrman was President and CFO of Gemini Voice Solutions, and earlier in his career, was an investment banker with Salomon Smith Barney.
Emulex Corporation (NYSE: ELX) announced that Michael J. Rockenbach, the Corporation’s executive vice president (EVP), chief financial officer (CFO) and corporate secretary, will be departing effective December 31, 2013. Mike Rockenbach joined Emulex in 1991, and has served as executive vice president and chief financial officer since 1997.
Billtrust announced the addition of Ed Jordan as the company’s new Chief Financial Officer. Jordan spent the last 25 years helping private equity-backed firms prepare for future investor opportunities. Among his many successes, Jordan led the acquisition of mobile barcode technology company JAGTAG Inc. as that company’s CEO; he also served as CFO of ITXC Corporation and Dialogic Inc., where he guided those two companies’ IPOs.
ConvergeOne welcomed Jeffrey Nachbor as its new Chief Financial Officer. Nachbor comes to ConvergeOne from Leap Wireless, where he was Senior Vice President of Operational Finance and Chief Accounting Officer. His previous positions include Senior Vice President of Finance and Controller at H&R Block, CFO and Treasurer at Sharper Image Corporation, and Senior Vice President and Corporate Controller at Staples, Inc., among others.
GAIN Capital Holdings, Inc. (NYSE: GCAP) announced the appointment of Jason Emerson as its Chief Financial Officer (CFO), effective October 1, 2013. Mr. Emerson was most recently Managing Director and Business Manager of KCG Holding’s Global Execution Services division. Previously, he served as KCG’s Director of Financial Operations.  Prior to KCG, Mr. Emerson held financial and operational positions at Instinet, Merrill Lynch and PricewaterhouseCoopers. GAIN’s interim CFO, Daryl Carlough, will be leaving the company to pursue other opportunities.  
Northrop Grumman Corporation (NYSE: NOC) announced that it has elected William H. Hernandez to its board of directors. Hernandez served as senior vice president, Finance, and chief financial officer of PPG Industries, Inc., a manufacturer of chemical and industrial products, until his retirement in 2009. Prior to that, he was PPG’s corporate controller from 1990 to 1994. Hernandez previously held a number of positions with Borg-Warner Corporation and Ford Motor Company. He is a member of the board of directors of Albemarle Corporation, Black Box Corporation and USG Corporation.
Commercial Vehicle Group, Inc. (NASDAQ: CVGI) announced that its Chief Financial Officer, Chad Utrup, is resigning to pursue an outside opportunity.  Mr. Utrup will remain active with the company until Friday, November 1 to ensure a smooth transition. Mr. Utrup began his CVG career in 1998.
KaloBios Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (NASDAQ: KBIO) announced that Herb C. Cross will join the company as of September 23, 2013, and transition into the Chief Financial Officer role in coordination with Jeffrey H. Cooper, the company’s current CFO.  The company expects this transition will be completed in the October-November time frame. Mr. Cross was previously Chief Financial Officer of Affymax. Before becoming CFO of Affymax, he served as the company’s Vice President, Finance.  Mr. Cross previously served as Vice President, Finance for Facet Biotech Corporation. Before joining Facet, he was corporate controller at PDL BioPharma. Before that, he held positions of increasing responsibility, including Vice President, Finance, at Neoforma, Inc.
Magellan Midstream Partners, L.P. (NYSE: MMP) announced that its chief financial officer, John Chandler, has provided notice that he intends to leave the partnership effective March 31, 2014.
SWS Group, Inc. (NYSE: SWS) announced that Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer Stacy M. Hodges has submitted her resignation effective September 30, 2013, to accept an executive position with a North Texas financial services company.
Trevena, Inc. announced the appointment of Roberto Cuca as senior vice president and chief financial officer. Most recently, he served as Treasurer and Senior Vice President, Finance at Endo Health Solutions Inc. Before that, he was Director, Corporate and Business Development, at moksha8 Pharmaceuticals, Inc. Mr. Cuca also worked at JPMorgan Chase & Co. as an equity analyst covering U.S. pharmaceutical companies.
Five Star Products, Inc. is pleased to announce that Frederic E. Rubin has joined the company’s leadership team as Chief Financial Officer. Before joining Five Star Products, Inc., he served as Managing Director of Sandhopper, LLC, and previously as Chief Financial Officer at the Judlau Companies.
Axcelis Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: ACLS) announced the appointment of Kevin J. Brewer as executive vice president and chief financial officer. Mr. Brewer, has served as the company’s interim CFO since July.
Children’s Hospitals and Clinics of Minnesota welcomes K. Alec Mahmood as its new chief financial officer. Mahmood succeeds Jerry Massman, who recently retired. Most recently, Mahmood spent five years as the chief financial officer for HealthMarkets. Prior to joining HealthMarkets, he was the chief financial officer and chief operating officer of the Medicaid division at Coventry Health Care. He has also held leadership positions at Ardent Health Services, Kaiser Permanente and Health Net.
PENSCO announced that Carol Foster, has been named Chief Financial Officer. Most recently, Foster was the founder of CLF Advisor.  Earlier in her career, she worked for Pantheon Ventures, Calera Capital, Merrill Lynch, Goldman Sachs and Accenture. PENSCO also announced that Chris Radich, formerly the CFO of PENSCO, has been named Chief Risk Officer, a new executive level position at the company. Earlier in his career, Radich worked for RCM Capital Management, Bank of America and Ernst & Young.
DeliverLean announced that Richard Silverman was recently named Chief Financial Officer. In his prior position, he served as the CFO of The Fresh Diet, Inc. For more than 15 years, Richard ran his own consulting firm. Mr. Silverman also owned and operated a specialty auto parts distributorship in Miami, FL. Prior to building his consultancy business, Richard served as the CFO of Bolivia’s third largest private mining company.
Odyssey Marine Exploration, Inc. (NASDAQ: OMEX) appointed Philip S. Devine as chief financial officer. Devine, who has been working as a consultant for Odyssey since August 1, 2013, succeeds Michael J. Holmes, whose intention to retire was reported in January. Prior to joining Odyssey, Devine served as CFO of a number of publicly-traded companies with operations in Europe and the United States. Most recently, he worked as a financial consultant via Decofi sprl and as the CFO of two biotechnology companies, MDxHealth and Tibotec-Virco (sold to Johnson & Johnson).
GoHealth announced that Robert R. Millard has joined the company as Chief Financial Officer. He succeeds Mike Ahern, who was named GoHealth’s Chief Accounting Officer. Millard most recently served as CFO at Angie’s List, Inc. He was a member of the executive team that took the company public in November 2011. Prior to that role, Millard served as CFO at two other publicly traded companies.
Cordia Bancorp Inc. (NASDAQ: BVA), parent of Bank of Virginia, announced the hiring of Mark A. Severson as Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of the Company and the Bank. Mr. Severson was most recently Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer of Chemung Financial Corporation in Elmira, NY. Before that he served as Chief Financial Officer of FNB United Corp. in Asheboro, NC from 2007 to 2011, Chief Financial Officer of Camco Financial Corporation in Cambridge, OH from 2001 to 2007, Chief Financial Officer of FCNB Corp. in Frederick, MD from 1990 to 2001, and Vice President of Union Planters Bank in Memphis, TN from 1984 to 1989.
Tenex Health announced that Chief Financial Officer, Dr. Rom Papadopoulos will be resigning as CFO and a member of the board of directors as of September 30, 2013. Dr. Papadopoulos will be returning to his position as Managing Director of Intuitus Group. Ivan Mijatovic, Chairman of the company’s Board of Directors, will assume responsibilities as interim CFO and oversee financial operations until a permanent CFO has been identified.
Baxano Surgical, Inc. (NASDAQ: BAXS) announced that Joe Slattery, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer, has resigned effective September 27, 2013 to pursue another business opportunity. Tim Shannon, Vice President of Finance, has been appointed Interim Chief Financial Officer effective September 27, 2013. Tim Shannon joined Baxano Surgical in 2013. Previously, he was Vice President of Financial Reporting at Talecris Biotherapeutics and Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer at Harris Wholesale. He began his career at PricewaterhouseCoopers. 
VHA Inc. has named Christopher Dunleavy as chief financial officer of enterprise operations. Since 2004, he has been the chief financial officer for USMD predecessor entities and executive vice president and chief financial officer for USMD Holdings since July 2011. Prior to that, Dunleavy served three years as chief financial officer for Baylor Heart and Vascular Hospital, LLP. In addition, Dunleavy was senior director of strategic planning for Sodexho Marriott Services, and provided consulting services to other companies. He also worked at Mariner Post Acute Network as vice president of finance.
Advanced Cannabis Solutions, Inc. (OTC: CANN) has appointed Christopher H. Taylor as Chief Financial Officer. Mr. Taylor’s previous experience includes gaming audit experience with Deloitte & Touche, the management of the Colorado Lottery budget as the Chief Budget Officer, the financial management of Colorado Casino Resorts, Inc., a publicly traded casino company, as CFO, and 12 years of public accounting experience as owner of his own CPA firm.
Barton Malow Company announced the promotion of Lars Luedeman to Vice President and Chief Financial Officer. Lars joined Barton Malow in 2012 as Director of Finance & Strategy. Prior to joining Barton Malow, Lars worked for Grant Thornton as Director, Corporate Advisory Services.
STRONG, LLC announced Billy Sanford as the new Vice President/Chief Financial Officer.
Severstal North America announced the appointments of Chief Financial Officer, Olga Petrova, and Deputy Chief Financial Officer, Michael Tuomey. Petrova joins Severstal North America’s executive team from parent company OAO Severstal, where she was the Head of the Business Planning and Controlling Department since 2011. Her previous roles included various high-level financial positions in international offices of Shell Exploration and Production, Schlumberger and PepsiCo. At SNA, Petrova will be responsible for all aspects of financial strategy, planning and reporting, as well as forecasting, budget management and cost benefit analysis. Petrova succeeds Interim CFO Michael Tuomey, who is appointed Deputy Chief Financial Officer. Tuomey has been with Severstal and its predecessor companies for 28 years in various senior-level finance positions, most recently Director, Corporate Accounting and Controlling.
myoscience, inc. announced the addition of Peter Osborne to the team as chief financial officer (CFO). Osborne has over 25 years of experience in high growth public and private companies, most notably with Hansen Medical and VNUS Medical Technologies, and most recently with SentreHEART, Inc.
Share this:LinkedInTwitterFacebookGoogleEmailPrintLike this:Like Loading...Follow CFO Moves via Email

Join the 6,384 people that receive this update by email every week. 
Enter your email address to subscribe to this blog and receive notifications of new posts by email.
 

							Email Address						












Sign up for the CFO Search Report
CFO Search Report, a follow on to CFO Moves, provides  information on CFO career opportunities in the market. 
CFO Search Report provides eligible CFOs with more information on the career opportunities identified in CFO Moves.  
CFO Search Report will provide monthly updates to eligible CFOs only. 
To apply to join and receive this exclusive monthly report, please click this link.
PS - Only qualified CFOs will be accepted to receive this exclusive monthly report. 


Samuel Dergel
Samuel is an Executive Search Consultant and CFO & Financial Executive Search Specialist with Dergel Executive Search.
Samuel and his team prepares this blog weekly so you can have one comprehensive source for CFO Moves across the USA. We track CFO Moves in our quest to be the most knowledgeable and up to date Executive Search firm focusing on the Chief Financial Officer.
If you are a company that would like help with your next CFO Hire, are a CFO that is looking to hire the right deputies for your team, or are a CFO looking for your next move, feel free to contact us.
Telephone: (415) 738-2070
Email: samuel@dergelcfo.com

 
 


Twitter: DergelCFOFollow"6 years later: Looking back at my career reboot" https://t.co/0DOtFZjK8z by @DergelCFO on @LinkedIn   Are you a #CFO with something to say about US #taxreform ?   RT @cfo: Penn West CFO and two deputies charged with #fraud. https://t.co/BlM98ACgrm https://t.co/oA76gnXLFu   This weeks' #CFO Moves includes movement at @LiquidRobotics @Kohls @MarinSoftware and 19 other co's… https://t.co/3VA0ZPZBq8   RT @OracleERPCloud: #CFOs: which quality best describes your style? See what else @DergelCFO thinks makes a great #CFO https://t.co/3TLWeah…   
Archives
Archives

Select Month
 July 2017 
 June 2017 
 May 2017 
 April 2017 
 March 2017 
 February 2017 
 January 2017 
 December 2016 
 November 2016 
 October 2016 
 September 2016 
 August 2016 
 July 2016 
 June 2016 
 May 2016 
 April 2016 
 March 2016 
 February 2016 
 January 2016 
 December 2015 
 November 2015 
 October 2015 
 September 2015 
 August 2015 
 July 2015 
 June 2015 
 May 2015 
 April 2015 
 March 2015 
 February 2015 
 January 2015 
 December 2014 
 November 2014 
 October 2014 
 September 2014 
 August 2014 
 July 2014 
 June 2014 
 May 2014 
 April 2014 
 March 2014 
 February 2014 
 January 2014 
 December 2013 
 November 2013 
 October 2013 
 September 2013 
 August 2013 
 July 2013 
 June 2013 
 May 2013 
 April 2013 
 March 2013 
 February 2013 
 January 2013 
 December 2012 
 November 2012 
 October 2012 
 September 2012 
 August 2012 
 July 2012 
 June 2012 
 May 2012 
 April 2012 
 March 2012 
 February 2012 
 January 2012 
 December 2011 
 November 2011 
 October 2011 
 September 2011 


EmailLinkedinRSSTwitter
© 2011-2016 Samuel Dergel (Executive Search Consultant and CFO Search Specialist). All rights reserved


 




Send to Email Address

Your Name

Your Email Address





Cancel

				Post was not sent - check your email addresses!			

				Email check failed, please try again			

				Sorry, your blog cannot share posts by email.			














%d bloggers like this:












Page not found - TheStreet

















 

 




















Action Alerts PLUS

Access AAPJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 2017Charitable Trust PortfolioMost Recent Trade Alert25 Investing Rules10 Trading Commandments

Real Money

Access RM25 Rules of InvestingJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 201710 CommandmentsStressed Out StocksCramer's Blog

Cramer
Mad Money
ETFs
Futures
Markets
Much More

BanksBiotechRetailTechPersonal FinanceRetirementFinancial Advisor CenterHow to SpendOptionsFixed IncomeVideo










Privacy Policy|Terms of Use© 1996- TheStreet Inc. All rights reserved
















                                DJIA
                            







                                NASDAQ
                            







                                S&P 500
                            






Market Data updated






Sign In




Your Membership(s)








Your Account





Account Preferences


Alerts


Newsletters







Subscribe





Logout



Subscribe

Access insights and guidance from our Wall Street pros. Find the product that's right for you.
Action Alerts PLUS
Action Alerts OPTIONS
Daily Swing Trade
Income Seeker
Quant Ratings
Real Money
Real Money Pro
Stocks Under $10
Top Stocks
Trifecta Stocks
Real Money Pro Portfolio
Chairman's Club
Compare All 
Chatter on the Street




































 
















Page not found

        Sorry, the page you're looking for is not available.
    
    You might want to try:
    

Our homepage


Our most popular stories






























 


©1996-2017 TheStreet, Inc. All rights reserved.Action Alerts PLUS is a registered trademark of TheStreet, Inc.




Compare Brokers



 







 







 







 







 







 















Insider Trading - Barge James W - Form 4 SEC Filings












Home |
Archives |
Products |
About |
Contact |
FAQ |



New User?
Sign Up | 
Sign In









Form 4 Filings


Insider Buys


Significant Buys


Penny StocksInsider Buying


Insider Sales




Insider Buy Sell Ratios


Stock Options


Insider TradingStock Screener


Insider TradingGraph View


Insider Watch





Sec Filings Insider Trading - Barge James W





Select Time period: 
1 Month
2 Months
3 Months
6 Months
1 Year
2 Years
3 Years
4 Years
All Data
 

     



google

   



yahoo!



Send this page to:  

Blog
  



Digg

  



Reddit

  



Facebook

  



Stumble

  



del.icio.us








Enter Stock Ticker Symbol or Cik:




Cik Lookup...






Search By Company or Insider Name:







"Insiders might sell their shares for any number of reasons, but they buy them for only one:
they think the price will rise"
- Peter Lynch ==>>

What is insider trading>>



Email a friend >>...







Historical filings delayed by 6 months. New user?
Sign Up for real time data.
Existing user?
Sign In

Stock options: Exercise, Award, Grant, Conversion



TransactionDate
ReportedDate
ExercisableExpiration
Company
Symnbol
InsiderRelationship
SharesTraded
ConversionPrice
SharesOwned
Filing




2016-12-28Option Award
2016-12-306:12 pm
N/AN/A
Lions Gate Entertainment Corp
LGFB
Barge James WChief Financial Officer
100,000
$25.22
425,000(Direct)
View


2016-12-28Option Award
2016-12-306:12 pm
N/A2026-12-28
Lions Gate Entertainment Corp
LGFB
Barge James WChief Financial Officer
425,000
$25.22
425,000(Direct)
View


2016-12-08Other
2016-12-129:26 pm
N/AN/A
Lions Gate Entertainment Corp
LGF
Barge James WChief Financial Officer
79,187
$0
148,319(Direct)
View


2016-12-08Other
2016-12-129:26 pm
N/AN/A
Lions Gate Entertainment Corp
LGF
Barge James WChief Financial Officer
39,593
$0
148,319(Direct)
View


2016-12-08Other
2016-12-129:26 pm
N/AN/A
Lions Gate Entertainment Corp
LGF
Barge James WChief Financial Officer
39,593
$0
148,319(Direct)
View


2016-12-08Other
2016-12-129:26 pm
N/A2023-09-16
Lions Gate Entertainment Corp
LGF
Barge James WChief Financial Officer
301,875
$37.45
148,319(Direct)
View


2016-12-08Other
2016-12-129:26 pm
N/A2023-09-16
Lions Gate Entertainment Corp
LGF
Barge James WChief Financial Officer
148,319
$38.76
148,319(Direct)
View


2016-12-08Other
2016-12-129:26 pm
N/A2023-09-16
Lions Gate Entertainment Corp
LGF
Barge James WChief Financial Officer
148,319
$37.47
148,319(Direct)
View


2016-12-08Other
2016-12-129:26 pm
N/A2020-05-08
Lions Gate Entertainment Corp
LGF
Barge James WChief Financial Officer
50,000
$30.72
148,319(Direct)
View


2016-12-08Other
2016-12-129:26 pm
N/A2020-05-08
Lions Gate Entertainment Corp
LGF
Barge James WChief Financial Officer
24,566
$31.8
148,319(Direct)
View


2016-12-08Other
2016-12-129:26 pm
N/A2020-05-08
Lions Gate Entertainment Corp
LGF
Barge James WChief Financial Officer
24,566
$30.74
148,319(Direct)
View


2016-09-22Tax Withholding
2016-09-235:49 pm
N/AN/A
Lions Gate Entertainment Corp
LGF
Barge James WChief Financial Officer
4,348
$20.97
79,187(Direct)
View


2016-09-21Option Award
2016-09-234:11 pm
N/AN/A
Scholastic Corp
SCHL
Barge James WDirector
1,089
$38.56
11,936(Direct)
View


2016-09-21Option Award
2016-09-234:11 pm
N/A2026-09-21
Scholastic Corp
SCHL
Barge James WDirector
2,112
$38.56
11,936(Direct)
View


2016-09-16Tax Withholding
2016-09-205:23 pm
N/AN/A
Lions Gate Entertainment Corp
LGF
Barge James WChief Financial OfficerDirector
3,261
$20.34
86,470(Direct)
View


2016-09-16Option Award
2016-09-205:23 pm
N/AN/A
Lions Gate Entertainment Corp
LGF
Barge James WChief Financial OfficerDirector
5,625
$0
86,470(Direct)
View


2016-09-16Tax Withholding
2016-09-205:23 pm
N/AN/A
Lions Gate Entertainment Corp
LGF
Barge James WChief Financial OfficerDirector
2,935
$21.59
86,470(Direct)
View


2016-09-16Option Award
2016-09-205:23 pm
2016-09-162023-09-16
Lions Gate Entertainment Corp
LGF
Barge James WChief Financial OfficerDirector
39,375
$37.45
86,470(Direct)
View


2016-05-27Option Award
2016-06-017:07 pm
N/AN/A
Lions Gate Entertainment Corp
LGF
Barge James WChief Financial Officer
47,037
$0
101,795(Direct)
View


2016-05-27Tax Withholding
2016-06-017:07 pm
N/AN/A
Lions Gate Entertainment Corp
LGF
Barge James WChief Financial Officer
17,689
$21.26
101,795(Direct)
View


2015-09-21Option Award
2015-09-237:22 pm
N/AN/A
Scholastic Corp
SCHL
Barge James WDirector
964
$0
10,847(Direct)
View


2015-09-21Option Award
2015-09-237:22 pm
N/A2025-09-21
Scholastic Corp
SCHL
Barge James WDirector
1,719
$43.56
10,847(Direct)
View


2015-09-22Tax Withholding
2015-09-235:26 pm
N/AN/A
Lions Gate Entertainment Corp
LGF
Barge James WChief Financial Officer
4,349
$39.48
54,758(Direct)
View


2015-09-16Tax Withholding
2015-09-186:18 pm
N/AN/A
Lions Gate Entertainment Corp
LGF
Barge James WChief Financial OfficerDirector
2,843
$38.51
62,368(Direct)
View


2015-09-16Option Award
2015-09-186:18 pm
N/AN/A
Lions Gate Entertainment Corp
LGF
Barge James WChief Financial OfficerDirector
6,250
$0
62,368(Direct)
View


2015-09-16Tax Withholding
2015-09-186:18 pm
N/AN/A
Lions Gate Entertainment Corp
LGF
Barge James WChief Financial OfficerDirector
3,261
$39.27
62,368(Direct)
View


2015-09-16Option Award
2015-09-186:18 pm
2015-09-152023-09-16
Lions Gate Entertainment Corp
LGF
Barge James WChief Financial OfficerDirector
43,750
$32
62,368(Direct)
View


2015-05-08Option Award
2015-05-127:24 pm
N/AN/A
Lions Gate Entertainment Corp
LGF
Barge James WChief Financial Officer
14,725
$0
64,495(Direct)
View


2015-05-08Tax Withholding
2015-05-127:24 pm
N/AN/A
Lions Gate Entertainment Corp
LGF
Barge James WChief Financial Officer
5,534
$30.56
64,495(Direct)
View


2015-05-08Option Award
2015-05-127:24 pm
N/A2020-05-08
Lions Gate Entertainment Corp
LGF
Barge James WChief Financial Officer
50,000
$30.72
64,495(Direct)
View









    © 2005-2017 SecForm4.Com All rights reserved.
    Archives:
    2017 2016 2015 2014 2013 2012 ... 
    Sun, 23 Jul 2017 03:53:37 -0500
  

    SEC is the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. EDGAR is a trademark of the SEC.
    SecForm4.Com is not affiliated with or approved by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC).
Terms of Use |
    Privacy Statement |
  











Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft














james barge - NetFind Content Results










AOL Search
Skip over navigation


















Search the Web




























Web


Web



Content











We Found James Barges | peoplelooker.com



Ad
 ·
www.peoplelooker.com



Get Cell Phone, Address, Pic & More James Barges's Info - Look Now.





Uncover Potential Relatives



Photos & Videos



Historical Deeds




Location History



Email Address



Monitor Social Info





We Found James Barges | secure.beenverified.com



Ad
 ·
secure.beenverified.com



Get Cell Phone, Address, Pic & More James Barges's Info - Look Now.





People Search



Search By Name



Search by Email




Best Background Check



Social Media



Get Contact Information





James Barge's History - James Barge's Past Available Online.



Ad
 ·
Records.TruthFinder.com



James Barge's Past Available Online. Simply Search a Name and State.





Learn More



Best People Search



Search Records Now



Search Arrest Records
















Science Barge




The Science Barge is a floating urban farm and environmental education center that has been docked in Yonkers, New York, USA since late 2008. The Barge grows crops using a hydroponic

more


Go to:
Encyclopedia
-
News
-
Videos
-
Reference


Source:
Wikipedia







Results From The WOW.Com Content Network

Lionsgate Picks James Barge To Succeed James Keegan As CFO

https://www.yahoo.com/tv/news/lionsgate-picks-james-barge-succeed...


SANTA MONICA, CA, September 20, 2013 – Lionsgate Chief Financial Officer James Keegan, a 25-year veteran of Lionsgate (NYSE: LGF) and its predecessor ...


Lionsgate CFO James Barge Renews Contract Through 2020

https://www.yahoo.com/movies/lionsgate-cfo-james-barge-renews...


Lionsgate CFO James Barge has extended his contract with the Hollywood studio through 2020. Lionsgate revealed in an Securities and Exchange Commission 8K ...


James River Barge Line Limited - Yahoo Local

https://local.yahoo.com/info-201989151-james-river-barge-line...


Find James River Barge Line Limited in Norfolk with Address, Phone number from Yahoo US Local. Includes James River Barge Line Limited Reviews, maps & directions to ...


James DeBarge - WOW.com

www.wow.com/wiki/James_DeBarge


Early life and career. He is the seventh child born to Robert DeBarge Sr. and Etterlene Abney DeBarge. Like all of his siblings, he was born and raised on the East ...


James DeBarge news, features and videos - WOW.com

www.wow.com/channel/james-debarge


All the latest news on James DeBarge. Includes blogs, articles, opinion, James DeBarge videos and more, on WOW.com


James Debarge Articles, Photos and Videos - AOL

https://www.aol.com/news/tag/james+debarge


Browse our collection of james debarge information for news stories, slideshows, opinion pieces and related videos posted on AOL.com.


Lionsgate CFO James Keegan Retires - Yahoo

https://www.yahoo.com/movies/news/lionsgate-cfo-james-keegan...


Lionsgate Chief Financial Officer James Keegan will retire from the studio next month and will be replaced by former Viacom Chief Financial Officer James W ...


Janet Jackson's Ex-Husband James DeBarge Claims the Two ...

https://www.yahoo.com/celebrity/janet-jacksons-ex-husband-james...


Janet Jackson's ex-husband claims the two have a secret daughter. ... Janet Jackson's Ex-Husband James DeBarge Claims the Two Have a Secret Daughter …


Edited Transcript of LGF earnings conference call or ...

https://finance.yahoo.com/news/edited-transcript-lgf-earnings...


James W. Barge, Lions Gate Entertainment Corp. - CFO [57]----- And Steve, regarding free cash flow, I don't think you can take the kind of ...


James Debarge | Yahoo Celebrity

https://www.yahoo.com/celebrity/tagged/james-debarge


Janet Jackson's Ex-Husband James DeBarge Claims the Two Have a Secret Daughter Together










We Found James Barges | peoplelooker.com



Ad
 ·
www.peoplelooker.com



Get Cell Phone, Address, Pic & More James Barges's Info - Look Now.





Uncover Potential Relatives



Photos & Videos



Historical Deeds




Location History



Email Address



Monitor Social Info





We Found James Barges | secure.beenverified.com



Ad
 ·
secure.beenverified.com



Get Cell Phone, Address, Pic & More James Barges's Info - Look Now.





People Search



Search By Name



Search by Email




Best Background Check



Social Media



Get Contact Information





James Barge's History - James Barge's Past Available Online.



Ad
 ·
Records.TruthFinder.com



James Barge's Past Available Online. Simply Search a Name and State.





Learn More



Best People Search



Search Records Now



Search Arrest Records




Searches related tojames barge



james debarge




12345Next

Related Searches



james debarge




















Search the Web

















© AOL Inc. All Rights Reserved.Privacy
 | Terms of Use
 | Preferences
 | Contact Us
 | Powered by Bing™

Wow.com - Part of the AOL Search Network














Background Checks and Public Records Search - Truthfinder








 


















Call Toll Free!  (800) 699-8081



Public Records Search
Social Media, Photos, Police Records, Background Checks, Contact Information and Much More!









START HERE - Try searching a friend, relative, celebrity, yourself, or someone else you might know...



First Name:





Last Name:





City:





State:


All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
District Of Columbia
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virgin Islands
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





This is me
Searching for yourself?




Search





  This secure connection is confirmed




We're Very Popular















What Our Happy Users Are Saying




"TruthFinder.com is freakishly accurate… Really scary how much info is out there." -Zac K.


"You found an old friend for me. Thank you." -Nancy V.


"TruthFinder is an excellent site for finding out about someone." -Sherrie F.


"This site is so wonderful. I found my lost godchildren and their mom. Thank you so much." -Lawrence W.


"This is one way to really know a potential date." -Charmaine R.


"Your service is more than perfect. It is a blessing. Thank you for the very hard work that you do." -Richard B.


"Truthfinder is a very accurate updated system. Their information is proper. And can be very helpful too." -Juan M.









Notice
This site contains REAL police records (court records of driving citations, speeding tickets, felonies, misdemeanors, sexual offenses, mugshots, etc.), background reports, photos, court documents, address information, phone numbers, and much more. Please BE CAREFUL when conducting a search and ensure all the information you enter is accurate.
Learning the truth about the history of your family and friends can be shocking, so please be cautious when using this tool.
TruthFinder does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency. We provide a lot of sensitive information that can be used to satisfy your curiosity, protect your family, and find the truth about the people in your life. You may not use our service or the information it provides to make decisions about consumer credit, employers, insurance, tenant screening, or any other purposes that would require FCRA compliance.
I Understand


Help Us Refine Your Results
Select Your Gender



Male



Female

NEXT

Skip






















Background Checks and Public Records Search - Truthfinder








 


















Call Toll Free!  (800) 699-8081



Public Records Search
Social Media, Photos, Police Records, Background Checks, Contact Information and Much More!









START HERE - Try searching a friend, relative, celebrity, yourself, or someone else you might know...



First Name:





Last Name:





City:





State:


All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
District Of Columbia
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virgin Islands
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





This is me
Searching for yourself?




Search





  This secure connection is confirmed




We're Very Popular















What Our Happy Users Are Saying




"TruthFinder.com is freakishly accurate… Really scary how much info is out there." -Zac K.


"You found an old friend for me. Thank you." -Nancy V.


"TruthFinder is an excellent site for finding out about someone." -Sherrie F.


"This site is so wonderful. I found my lost godchildren and their mom. Thank you so much." -Lawrence W.


"This is one way to really know a potential date." -Charmaine R.


"Your service is more than perfect. It is a blessing. Thank you for the very hard work that you do." -Richard B.


"Truthfinder is a very accurate updated system. Their information is proper. And can be very helpful too." -Juan M.









Notice
This site contains REAL police records (court records of driving citations, speeding tickets, felonies, misdemeanors, sexual offenses, mugshots, etc.), background reports, photos, court documents, address information, phone numbers, and much more. Please BE CAREFUL when conducting a search and ensure all the information you enter is accurate.
Learning the truth about the history of your family and friends can be shocking, so please be cautious when using this tool.
TruthFinder does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency. We provide a lot of sensitive information that can be used to satisfy your curiosity, protect your family, and find the truth about the people in your life. You may not use our service or the information it provides to make decisions about consumer credit, employers, insurance, tenant screening, or any other purposes that would require FCRA compliance.
I Understand


Help Us Refine Your Results
Select Your Gender



Male



Female

NEXT

Skip






















Background Checks and Public Records Search - Truthfinder








 


















Call Toll Free!  (800) 699-8081



Public Records Search
Social Media, Photos, Police Records, Background Checks, Contact Information and Much More!









START HERE - Try searching a friend, relative, celebrity, yourself, or someone else you might know...



First Name:





Last Name:





City:





State:


All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
District Of Columbia
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virgin Islands
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





This is me
Searching for yourself?




Search





  This secure connection is confirmed




We're Very Popular















What Our Happy Users Are Saying




"TruthFinder.com is freakishly accurate… Really scary how much info is out there." -Zac K.


"You found an old friend for me. Thank you." -Nancy V.


"TruthFinder is an excellent site for finding out about someone." -Sherrie F.


"This site is so wonderful. I found my lost godchildren and their mom. Thank you so much." -Lawrence W.


"This is one way to really know a potential date." -Charmaine R.


"Your service is more than perfect. It is a blessing. Thank you for the very hard work that you do." -Richard B.


"Truthfinder is a very accurate updated system. Their information is proper. And can be very helpful too." -Juan M.









Notice
This site contains REAL police records (court records of driving citations, speeding tickets, felonies, misdemeanors, sexual offenses, mugshots, etc.), background reports, photos, court documents, address information, phone numbers, and much more. Please BE CAREFUL when conducting a search and ensure all the information you enter is accurate.
Learning the truth about the history of your family and friends can be shocking, so please be cautious when using this tool.
TruthFinder does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency. We provide a lot of sensitive information that can be used to satisfy your curiosity, protect your family, and find the truth about the people in your life. You may not use our service or the information it provides to make decisions about consumer credit, employers, insurance, tenant screening, or any other purposes that would require FCRA compliance.
I Understand


Help Us Refine Your Results
Select Your Gender



Male



Female

NEXT

Skip






















Background Checks and Public Records Search - Truthfinder








 


















Call Toll Free!  (800) 699-8081



Public Records Search
Social Media, Photos, Police Records, Background Checks, Contact Information and Much More!









START HERE - Try searching a friend, relative, celebrity, yourself, or someone else you might know...



First Name:





Last Name:





City:





State:


All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
District Of Columbia
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virgin Islands
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





This is me
Searching for yourself?




Search





  This secure connection is confirmed




We're Very Popular















What Our Happy Users Are Saying




"TruthFinder.com is freakishly accurate… Really scary how much info is out there." -Zac K.


"You found an old friend for me. Thank you." -Nancy V.


"TruthFinder is an excellent site for finding out about someone." -Sherrie F.


"This site is so wonderful. I found my lost godchildren and their mom. Thank you so much." -Lawrence W.


"This is one way to really know a potential date." -Charmaine R.


"Your service is more than perfect. It is a blessing. Thank you for the very hard work that you do." -Richard B.


"Truthfinder is a very accurate updated system. Their information is proper. And can be very helpful too." -Juan M.









Notice
This site contains REAL police records (court records of driving citations, speeding tickets, felonies, misdemeanors, sexual offenses, mugshots, etc.), background reports, photos, court documents, address information, phone numbers, and much more. Please BE CAREFUL when conducting a search and ensure all the information you enter is accurate.
Learning the truth about the history of your family and friends can be shocking, so please be cautious when using this tool.
TruthFinder does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency. We provide a lot of sensitive information that can be used to satisfy your curiosity, protect your family, and find the truth about the people in your life. You may not use our service or the information it provides to make decisions about consumer credit, employers, insurance, tenant screening, or any other purposes that would require FCRA compliance.
I Understand


Help Us Refine Your Results
Select Your Gender



Male



Female

NEXT

Skip






















Background Checks and Public Records Search - Truthfinder








 


















Call Toll Free!  (800) 699-8081



Public Records Search
Social Media, Photos, Police Records, Background Checks, Contact Information and Much More!









START HERE - Try searching a friend, relative, celebrity, yourself, or someone else you might know...




First Name:





Last Name:





City:





State:


All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
District Of Columbia
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virgin Islands
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





we also search social networks:

















This is me
Searching for yourself?




Search






  This secure connection is confirmed




We're Very Popular















What Our Happy Users Are Saying




"TruthFinder.com is freakishly accurate… Really scary how much info is out there." -Zac K.


"You found an old friend for me. Thank you." -Nancy V.


"TruthFinder is an excellent site for finding out about someone." -Sherrie F.


"This site is so wonderful. I found my lost godchildren and their mom. Thank you so much." -Lawrence W.


"This is one way to really know a potential date." -Charmaine R.


"Your service is more than perfect. It is a blessing. Thank you for the very hard work that you do." -Richard B.


"Truthfinder is a very accurate updated system. Their information is proper. And can be very helpful too." -Juan M.









Notice
This site contains REAL police records (court records of driving citations, speeding tickets, felonies, misdemeanors, sexual offenses, mugshots, etc.), background reports, photos, court documents, address information, phone numbers, and much more. Please BE CAREFUL when conducting a search and ensure all the information you enter is accurate.
Learning the truth about the history of your family and friends can be shocking, so please be cautious when using this tool.
TruthFinder does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency. We provide a lot of sensitive information that can be used to satisfy your curiosity, protect your family, and find the truth about the people in your life. You may not use our service or the information it provides to make decisions about consumer credit, employers, insurance, tenant screening, or any other purposes that would require FCRA compliance.
I Understand


Help Us Refine Your Results
Select Your Gender



Male



Female

NEXT

Skip
















